District of Columbia statutes.
2-1503.01

Neighborhood Planning Councils — Established; elections; tenure.

(a)

There shall be 2 neighborhood planning councils in each election ward established pursuant to § 1-1011.01. The Mayor, by rulemaking, shall draw boundaries for neighborhood planning councils, after each decennial census, so that they are approximately equal in population.

(b)

(1)

Regular elections for the neighborhood planning councils shall be held in even numbered years on a date set by the Mayor by rulemaking.

(2)

Any neighborhood planning council member holding office immediately prior to June 19, 1992, may continue to hold office until a successor is elected and qualifies for office pursuant to this subchapter.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-93, § 4a
as added Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-194, § 2(b), 39 DCR 9010
This section is referenced in § 2-1501.
1981 Ed., § 1-2603.1.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Youth Services Act of 1976 Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-151, September 15, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 7281).